Wyoming, session 2026, SF0003.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-2-604 and 6-3-308 are created to
read:

SF0003

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0074
6-2-604. Use of force in defense of nuclear
facilities; definitions; detention authority.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Armed nuclear security guard" means a
person who is:

(A) Employed by or contracted with a
nuclear power reactor that is licensed by the United States
nuclear regulatory commission and is located at a
commercial nuclear facility;

(B) Employed or contracted as part of the
security plan approved by the United States nuclear
regulatory commission and who meets the requirements
mandated by the commission for carrying a firearm; and

(C) Certified as a peace officer by the
peace officer standards and training commission.

(ii) "Commercial nuclear facility" means a
facility that is owned by any person, is licensed by the
SF0003

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0074
United States nuclear regulatory commission and that is
required to have a security plan for the facility approved
by the United States nuclear regulatory commission.
"Commercial nuclear facility":

(A) Shall not include any facility owned by
the United States nuclear regulatory commission;

(B) Includes the property on which the
facility is located and any other structure and fencing
associated with the facility.

(iii) "Exclusion area" means the area of a
commercial nuclear facility in which a United States
nuclear regulatory commission licensee has the authority to
determine all activities, including the exclusion or
removal of property and personnel from the area;

(iv) "Protected area" means the area of a
commercial nuclear facility within the exclusion area that
is encompassed by physical barriers;

SF0003

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0074
(v) "Structure and fencing" means any structure,
fenced yard, wall, building or other similar barrier or
combination thereof that surrounds a commercial nuclear
facility and that is posted with signage stating that it is
a felony to trespass at the commercial nuclear facility.

(b) An armed nuclear security guard is privileged to
use defensive force against another person at a commercial
nuclear facility if the guard reasonably believes that the
defensive force is necessary to prevent or terminate the
commission of a burglary under W.S. 6-3-301, criminal entry
under W.S. 6-3-302, criminal trespass under W.S. 6-3-303 or
criminal trespass at a commercial nuclear facility under
W.S. 6-3-308 within or upon a protected area.

(c) An armed nuclear security guard is privileged to
use defensive force, including deadly force, against
another person at a commercial nuclear facility if the
guard reasonably believes that defensive force or deadly
force is necessary to:

(i) Prevent the commission of a murder,
manslaughter, aggravated assault, kidnapping, burglary,
SF0003

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0074
criminal entry, arson or robbery within or upon a protected
area;

(ii) Prevent acts of radiological sabotage or
the theft or diversion of special nuclear material within
or upon a protected area under a security plan approved by
the United States nuclear regulatory commission;

(iii) Defend against the use or imminent use of
deadly force against the guard or other person within or
upon a protected area.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section, an armed nuclear security guard is privileged to
threaten to use defensive force, including deadly force, if
and to the extent that the armed nuclear security guard
believes that the threat of force is necessary to protect
the guard or others against another person's potential use
of force or deadly force within or upon a protected area.

(e) An armed nuclear security guard using defensive
force, including deadly force, in accordance with this
SF0003

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0074
section shall not be liable under civil or criminal law for
engaging in conduct that is privileged under this section.

(f) An armed nuclear security guard, acting upon
reasonable belief, may detain a person in or at a
commercial nuclear facility in a reasonable manner and for
a reasonable time if the person is suspected of committing
or attempting to commit any of the offenses specified in
subsection (b) and paragraph (c)(i) of this section for
purposes of summoning law enforcement.

(g) For purposes of subsection (f) of this section,
an armed nuclear security guard's reasonable belief to
detain a person under subsection (f) of this section shall
constitute an affirmative defense in any civil or criminal
action against the armed nuclear security guard, the
guard's employer or the owner of the commercial nuclear
facility where the guard was employed for false arrest,
false imprisonment, unlawful imprisonment or unlawful
detention.

6-3-308. Criminal trespass at a commercial nuclear
facility.
SF0003

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0074

(a) The definitions of W.S. 6-2-604 shall apply to
this section.

(b) A person is guilty of criminal trespass at a
commercial nuclear facility if the person knowingly:

(i) Enters or remains unlawfully in or on a
commercial nuclear facility; or

(ii) Enters or remains unlawfully within the
structure and fencing of a commercial nuclear facility.

(c) Criminal trespass at a commercial nuclear
facility is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not
more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0003